Utah statutes.
53B-19-102.   Establishment of state arboreta at University of Utah and Utah State University.

State arboreta are created and established at the University of Utah and Utah State University.  The universities may, on behalf of the people of this state, cultivate a greater knowledge and public appreciation for the trees and plants around us, as well as those growing in remote sections of the country and world.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1993 General Session

